Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.480

Factory built housing and commercial structures, installation—Rules—Enforcement—Standards—Fees—Waiver of provisions during state of emergency.

(1) The department shall adopt and enforce rules that protect the health, safety, and property of the people of this state by assuring that all factory built housing or factory built commercial structures are structurally sound and that the plumbing, heating, electrical, and other components thereof are reasonably safe. The rules shall be reasonably consistent with recognized and accepted principles of safety and structural soundness, and in adopting the rules the department shall consider, so far as practicable, the standards and specifications contained in the uniform building, plumbing, and mechanical codes, including the barrier free code and the Washington energy code as adopted by the state building code council pursuant to chapter 19.27A RCW, and the national electrical code, including the state rules as adopted pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW and published by the national fire protection association or, when applicable, the temporary worker building code adopted under RCW 70.114A.081.

(2) The department shall set a schedule of fees which will cover the costs incurred by the department in the administration and enforcement of RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490.

(3) The director may adopt rules that provide for approval of a plan that is certified as meeting state requirements or the equivalent by a professional who is licensed or certified in a state whose licensure or certification requirements meet or exceed Washington requirements.

(4) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this section or any portion of this section or under any administrative rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

[ 2008 c 181 s 204; 1998 c 37 s 4; 1995 c 289 s 2; 1989 c 134 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 76 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 22 s 5; 1970 ex.s. c 44 s 7.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2008 c 181: See note following RCW 43.06.220.